Utah statutes.
75-3-715.   Powers and duties of successor personal representative.

A successor personal representative has the same power and duty as the original personal representative to complete the administration and distribution of the estate, as expeditiously as possible, but he shall not exercise any power expressly made personal to the executor named in the will.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

